Tennessee, session 114, HB1546.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-50-411, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection (e):
Subsections (b) and (c) shall not apply to a person who holds a commercial
driver license and is certified as medically qualified to operate a commercial motor
vehicle pursuant to 49 CFR 391.43 if that certificate is issued by a medical examiner
certified by the federal motor carrier safety administration and listed on the national
registry of certified medical examiners in accordance with 49 CFR Part 390, Subpart D.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1546
010863
- 1 -